Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 34    0       txoontzat      .
SFX 34    0       tetxoez      .
SFX 34    0       tetxoaz      .
SFX 34    0       terekiko      .
SFX 34    0       oz      .
SFX 34    0       tetzarreko      .
SFX 34    0       rainoko      .
SFX 34    0       tara      .
SFX 34    0       txoago      .
SFX 34    0       teetako      .
SFX 34    0       teagandik      .
SFX 34    0       regatik      .
SFX 34    0       txorantz      .
SFX 34    0       aganaino      .
SFX 34    0       tetzarrontzat      .
SFX 34    0       etarantz      .
SFX 34    0       otarik      .
SFX 34    0       otarat      .
SFX 34    0       agoraino      .
SFX 34    0       egitako      .
SFX 34    0       tetxorik      .
SFX 34    0       tetzarrarekin      .
SFX 34    0       tetxoren      .
SFX 34    0       tetxorat      .
SFX 34    0       tzarroi      .
SFX 34    0       teei      .
SFX 34    0       teari      .
SFX 34    0       tzarrok      .
SFX 34    0       teek      .
SFX 34    0       teak      .
SFX 34    0       tzarrari      .
SFX 34    0       tzarron      .
SFX 34    0       tean      .
SFX 34    0       tearekiko      .
SFX 34    0       etako      .
SFX 34    0       agoarentzat      .
SFX 34    0       tear      .
SFX 34    0       tzarroz      .
SFX 34    0       teez      .
SFX 34    0       teaz      .
SFX 34    0       tetzarrarentzat      .
SFX 34    0       teagana      .
SFX 34    0       teagan      .
SFX 34    0       egitzat      .
SFX 34    0       otara      .
SFX 34    0       agoontzat      .
SFX 34    0       txoarekin      .
SFX 34    0       tenago      .
